Washington statutes.
RCW 18.230.060

Registration—Grounds for denial.

(1) Applicants for registration under this chapter are subject to the grounds for denial of a registration under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(2) The secretary must issue a registration to an applicant who completes an application form that identifies the name and address of the applicant, the registration requested, and information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are grounds for denial of a registration.

[ 2002 c 216 s 7.]